Vermont, session 2025-2026, H654.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds:
(1) The federal government has formally acknowledged the existence of
unidentified anomalous phenomena (UAP) and has established the All-Domain
VT LEG #386315 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.654
2026 Page 2 of 9
Anomaly Resolution Office within the U.S. Department of Defense to
coordinate federal investigation and oversight of UAP-related reports.
(2) In 2023, the U.S. Congress enacted the Unidentified Anomalous
Phenomena Disclosure Act as an amendment to the National Defense
Authorization Act, establishing requirements for transparency, centralized
records management, and standardized federal investigation of UAP. The
amendment was a bipartisan effort led by Senators Charles E. Schumer,
Michael D. Rounds, Marco Rubio, and Kirsten E. Gillibrand.
(3) Independent research organizations have developed expertise in the
scientific investigation of UAP. The Scientific Coalition for UAP Studies, a
nonprofit interdisciplinary research organization composed of scientists,
engineers, law enforcement, and former military and intelligence professionals,
has conducted peer-reviewed analyses and collaborates with academic
institutions and government partners to advance scientific understanding of
UAP.
(4) Vermont has experienced recent public reports of unidentified aerial
objects that have required law enforcement response, including low-altitude
drone-like sightings and aircraft safety concerns. These incidents underscore
the need for a coordinated State-led mechanism to assess and respond to
airspace hazards.
VT LEG #386315 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.654
2026 Page 3 of 9
Sec. 2. 5 V.S.A. chapter 9, subchapter 3 is added to read:
Subchapter 3. Vermont Airspace Safety and Unidentified Anomalous
Phenomena Task Force
§ 241. VERMONT AIRSPACE SAFETY AND UNIDENTIFIED
ANOMALOUS PHENOMENA TASK FORCE
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “SCU” means the Scientific Coalition for UAP Studies.
(2) “Unidentified anomalous phenomena” means any object operating in
the atmosphere or underwater that cannot be readily attributed to a known or
conventional source, including unknown aircraft, drones, or other anomalous
objects exhibiting performance characteristics not consistent with currently
understood technologies, such as instantaneous acceleration absent observable
inertia or hypersonic velocity without a corresponding thermal signature or
sonic boom.
(b) Creation. There is created within the Department of Public Safety the
Vermont Airspace Safety and Unidentified Anomalous Phenomena Task
Force. The Task Force shall coordinate its work jointly through the
Department of Public Safety and the Agency of Transportation and may
engage independent experts to support its charge.
(c) Purpose. The purpose of the Task Force is to:
VT LEG #386315 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.654
2026 Page 4 of 9
(1) evaluate reports of unidentified anomalous phenomena, including
drones, balloons, and objects exhibiting anomalous behavior that cannot be
readily identified as weather phenomena, commercial products, or
conventional technologies legally operating in Vermont airspace;
(2) assess airspace and public safety risks;
(3) coordinate Vermont’s response with federal, academic, and private
sector partners; and
(4) develop recommendations to improve incident reporting, emergency
response, transparency, and scientific analysis.
(d) Membership. The Task Force shall be composed of the following 10
members:
(1) the Commissioner of Public Safety or designee, who shall serve as
Co-Chair;
(2) the Secretary of Transportation or designee, who shall serve as Co-
Chair;
(3) one member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the
Speaker of the House;
(4) one member of the Senate, appointed by the Committee on
Committees;
(5) a representative of the Vermont National Guard, appointed by the
Adjutant General;
VT LEG #386315 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.654
2026 Page 5 of 9
(6) a representative of the Vermont Bureau of Criminal Investigation,
appointed by the Governor in consultation with the Commissioner of Public
Safety;
(7) a representative of the Vermont airport system or general aviation
operations, appointed by the Governor in consultation with the Secretary of
Transportation;
(8) one academic expert in aerospace or atmospheric science, appointed
by the Governor;
(9) one independent expert in radar or sensor systems, appointed by the
Governor; and
(10) a representative of the Vermont Intelligence Center, appointed by
the Commissioner of Public Safety.
(e) Technical assistance. The Task Force shall have the scientific and
technical assistance of SCU. SCU shall serve as the principal scientific analyst
for data and evidence related to unidentified anomalous phenomena. SCU may
receive incident reports and related information from State agencies, apply
scientific methodologies to analyze the data, and furnish the Task Force with
detailed analytical reports and findings. All analyses, conclusions, and
hypotheses developed by SCU under this subsection shall be submitted to the
Task Force for review and approval. The Task Force shall retain ultimate
authority over the use of any analytical results in policy development or public
VT LEG #386315 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.654
2026 Page 6 of 9
communications. SCU’s work shall be conducted pursuant to guidelines
established by the Task Force to ensure scientific integrity, objectivity, and
consistency with State investigative standards.
(f) Powers and duties. The Task Force shall:
(1) review and analyze reports of unidentified anomalous phenomena
activity in Vermont;
(2) collaborate with federal, academic, and private sector partners to
improve information sharing and data consistency;
(3) develop best practices for voluntary reporting, secure data storage,
and analysis;
(4) assess aviation and public safety risks posed by unidentified aerial
objects, including unregistered drones or other anomalous craft, and
recommend procedures for incident response, pilot reporting, and emergency
coordination;
(5) hold at least one public meeting annually to share information and
collect input; and
(6) submit an annual report with findings and recommendations
pursuant to subsection (i) of this section.
(g) Administrative support. The Department of Public Safety and the
Agency of Transportation shall provide administrative, technical, and legal
support to the Task Force as needed. This may include staff assistance,
VT LEG #386315 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.654
2026 Page 7 of 9
meeting logistics, public communications, and coordination with other state or
federal entities. The Task Force may also request support from other
departments or agencies as necessary to carry out its responsibilities.
(h) Transparency and public access.
(1) The Task Force shall maintain a public web page hosted by the
Department of Public Safety containing notices of upcoming meetings,
meeting minutes, and any nonconfidential materials.
(2) A confidential, voluntary reporting process for unidentified
anomalous phenomena sightings by Vermont residents or officials may be
developed in consultation with SCU and the Department of Public Safety.
(3) Reports, data, and findings shall be made publicly available, subject
to State and federal privacy or security restrictions.
(4) All confidential reports shall be retained in a secure system
maintained by the Department of Public Safety or a designated technical
partner.
(i) Reports. Annually on or before December 15, the Task Force shall
submit a written report to the Governor, the House Committees on
Transportation and on Government Operations and Military Affairs, and the
Senate Committees on Transportation and on Government Operations. The
report shall include:
VT LEG #386315 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.654
2026 Page 8 of 9
(1) a summary of activities and findings of the Task Force during the
previous year;
(2) any recommendations for legislative or administrative action to
enhance public and aviation safety potentially affected by documented
unidentified anomalous phenomena activity; and
(3) any recommendations for advancements in research collaboration
between government, academic institutions, and private sector to improve
detection, response, and analysis of unidentified anomalous phenomena.
(j) Compensation and reimbursement.
(1) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Task Force serving in the member’s
capacity as a legislator shall be entitled to per diem compensation and
reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23 for not more than 12
meetings. These payments shall be made from monies appropriated to the
General Assembly.
(2) Other members of the Task Force shall be entitled to per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A.
§ 1010 for not more than 12 meetings. These payments shall be made from
monies appropriated to the Department of Public Safety.
(k) FAA jurisdiction. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
supersede or conflict with the jurisdiction of the Federal Aviation
VT LEG #386315 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.654
2026 Page 9 of 9
Administration over airspace and aviation safety. The Task Force shall not
promulgate or enforce air safety regulations but may make policy
recommendations relevant to state coordination and public information.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386315 v.1